Wisconsin, session 2025, SB520.
do enact as follows:SB520,14Section 1. 11.1208 (4) of the statutes is renumbered 11.1208 (4) (a).SB520,21Section 2. 11.1208 (4) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB520,2,5211.1208 (4) (b) No foreign national may make a contribution to a referendum 3committee, and no referendum committee may accept a contribution from a foreign 4national. In this paragraph, “foreign national” has the meaning given in 11 CFR 5110.20 (a) (3) and 52 USC 30121 (b).SB520,2,66